Utah statutes.
13-11-21.   Settlement of class action -- Complaint in class action
delivered to enforcing authority.
(1) (a)  A defendant in a class action may file a written offer of settlement.
If it is not accepted within a reasonable time by a plaintiff class
representative, the defendant may file an affidavit reciting the rejection.
The court may determine that the offer has enough merit to present to the
members of the class.  If it so determines, it shall order a hearing to
determine whether the offer should be approved.  It shall give the best notice
of the hearing that is practicable under the circumstances, including notice
to each member who can be identified through reasonable effort.  The notice
shall specify the terms of the offer and a reasonable period within which
members of the class who request it are entitled to be included in the class.
The statute of limitations for those who are excluded pursuant to this
Subsection (1) is tolled for the period the class action has been pending,
plus an additional year.
(b)  If a member who has previously lost an opportunity to be excluded from
the class is excluded at his request in response to notice of the offer of
settlement during the period specified under Subsection (1)(a), he may not
thereafter participate in a class action for damages respecting the same
consumer transaction, unless the court later disapproves the offer of
settlement or approves a settlement materially different from that proposed in
the original offer of settlement.  After the expiration of the period of
limitations, a member of the class is not entitled to be excluded from it.
(c)  If the court later approves the offer of settlement, including changes,
if any, required by the court in the interest of a just settlement of the
action, it shall enter judgment, which is binding on all persons who are then
members of the class.  If the court disapproves the offer or approves a
settlement materially different from that proposed in the original offer,
notice shall be given to a person who was excluded from the action at his
request in response to notice of the offer under Subsection (1)(a), and he is
entitled to rejoin the class and, in the case of the approval, participate in
the settlement.
(2)  On the commencement of a class action under Section 13-11-19, the class
representative shall mail by certified mail with return receipt requested or
personally serve a copy of the complaint on the enforcing authority.  Within
30 days after the receipt of a copy of the complaint, but not thereafter, the
enforcing authority may intervene in the class action.
